Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1473
Act; violation; civil action for injunctive relief; authorized; procedure.

(1)(a) A dealer, manufacturer, distributor, or warrantor may bring a civil action in district court to seek injunctive relief relating to a violation or a potential violation of the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act or a manufacturer-dealer agreement.

(b) Venue for any civil action under this section shall be brought:

(i) If only one dealer is a party to the civil action, in the district court of the county where the dealership is located;

(ii) If more than one dealer is a party to the civil action, in the district court of any county where a dealer that is a party to the action is located; or

(iii) If no party to the civil action is a dealer, in any district court with relevant jurisdiction.

(2) After a hearing and if cause has been shown, the court may issue a temporary or permanent injunction, or both, that restrains any person from violating the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act or a manufacturer-dealer agreement.

(3) Such injunction shall be issued without bond.

(4) A single act in violation of the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act is sufficient to authorize the issuance of an injunction under this section.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 32.
October 1, 2026